Maryland, session 2026, SB0247.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 10–725(a), (b), (c), (d) and (e), (f), (g), (h), and (i) of Article – Tax – General
of the Annotated Code of Maryland be transferred to be Section(s) 5–2701, 5–2702, 5–2703,
5–2704, 5–2706, 5–2707, 5–2708, and 5–2709, respectively, to be under the new subtitle
“Subtitle 27. Biotechnology Investment Incentive Grant Program” of Article – Economic
Development of the Annotated Code of Maryland.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Economic Development
2.5–109.
(a) In this section, “economic development program” means:
(1) the Economic Development Opportunities Program Account
established under § 7–314 of the State Finance and Procurement Article;
(2) the Partnership for Workforce Quality Program established under Title
3, Subtitle 4 of this article;
(3) each of the economic development and financial assistance programs
established under Title 5 of this article; and
(4) each of the tax credit programs administered by the Department,
including:
(i) the Film Production Activity Tax Credit;
(ii) the Job Creation Tax Credit;
(iii) the One Maryland Economic Development Tax Credit;
(iv) [the Biotechnology Investment Incentive Tax Credit;
(v)] the Research and Development Tax Credit;
[(vi)] (V) the Security Clearance Administrative Expenses and
Construction and Equipment Costs Tax Credit;
[(vii)] (VI) the Innovation Investment Incentive Tax Credit;
[(viii)] (VII) the More Jobs for Marylanders Tax Credit;

SENATE BILL 247
[(ix)] (VIII) the Purchase of Cybersecurity Technology or Service Tax
Credit;
[(x)] (IX) the Opportunity Zone Enhancement Tax Credit;
[(xi)] (X) the Small Business Relief Tax Credit;
[(xii)] (XI) any other tax credit program that is administered by the
Department under:
1. Title 6 of this article; or
2. Title 10, Subtitle 7 of the Tax – General Article; and
[(xiii)] (XII) the Theatrical Production Tax Credit.
Subtitle 27. Biotechnology Investment Incentive Grant Program.
5–2701.
(a) [(1)] In this [section] SUBTITLE the following words have the meanings
indicated.
[(2)] (B) “Biotechnology company” means a company organized for profit
that is primarily engaged in, or within 2 months will be primarily engaged in, the research,
development, or commercialization of innovative and proprietary technology that
comprises, interacts with, or analyzes biological material including biomolecules (DNA,
RNA, or protein), cells, tissues, or organs.
[(3)] (C) [(i)] (1) “Company” means any entity of any form duly
organized and existing under the laws of any jurisdiction for the purpose of conducting
business for profit.
[(ii)] (2) “Company” does not include a sole proprietorship.
[(4) “Department” means the Department of Commerce.
(5)] (D) “FUND” MEANS THE BIOTECHNOLOGY INVESTMENT
INCENTIVE GRANT PROGRAM FUND.
(E) [(i)] (1) “Investment” means the contribution of money in cash or cash
equivalents expressed in United States dollars, at a risk of loss, to a qualified Maryland
biotechnology company in exchange for stock, a partnership or membership interest, or
other ownership interest in the equity of the qualified Maryland biotechnology company,
title to which ownership interest shall vest in the qualified investor.

SENATE BILL 247 5
[(ii)] (2) “Investment” does not include debt.
[(iii)] (3) For purposes of this [section] SUBTITLE, an investment is
at risk of loss when its repayment entirely depends upon the success of the business
operations of the qualified company.
(F) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE BIOTECHNOLOGY INVESTMENT INCENTIVE
GRANT PROGRAM.
[(6)] (G) [(i)] (1) “Qualified investor” means any individual or entity
that invests at least $25,000 in a qualified Maryland biotechnology company and that is
required to file an income tax return in any jurisdiction.
[(ii)] (2) “Qualified investor” does not include:
[1.] (I) a qualified pension plan, individual retirement
account, or other qualified retirement plan under the Employee Retirement Income
Security Act of 1974, as amended, or fiduciaries or custodians under such plans, or similar
tax–favored plans or entities under the laws of other countries; or
[2.] (II) a founder or current employee of the qualified
Maryland biotechnology company, if the company has been in active business for more than
5 years.
[(7)] (H) [(i)] (1) “Qualified Maryland biotechnology company”
means a biotechnology company that:
[1.] (I) has its headquarters and base of operations in this
State;
[2.] (II) has fewer than 50 full–time employees;
[3.] (III) has been in active business no longer than 12 years;
[4.] (IV) does not have its securities publicly traded on any
exchange;
[5.] (V) has been certified as a biotechnology company by
the Department; and
[6.] (VI) the qualified investors in the company have not
received more than $7,000,000 in tax credits UNDER THE BIOTECHNOLOGY
INVESTMENT INCENTIVE TAX CREDIT PROGRAM OR GRANTS in the aggregate under
this [section] SUBTITLE.

SENATE BILL 247
[(ii)] (2) “Qualified Maryland biotechnology company” includes a
company that, within 2 months of the receipt of the investment, has met the requirements
of [subparagraph (i) of this paragraph] PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
[(8) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Commerce.]
5–2702.
[(b)] (A) (1) THERE IS A BIOTECHNOLOGY INVESTMENT INCENTIVE
GRANT PROGRAM IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(2) THE PROGRAM IS THE SUCCESSOR TO THE BIOTECHNOLOGY
INVESTMENT INCENTIVE TAX CREDIT PROGRAM.
[(1)] (B) The [Biotechnology Investment Incentive Tax Credit is
intended] PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS to foster the growth of Maryland’s
biotechnology industry by incentivizing investment in early stage companies with the goal
of increasing the number of companies developing biotechnologies in Maryland, increasing
overall investments in the biotechnology sector, and increasing the number of individual
investors actively investing in Maryland’s life sciences companies.
[(2)] (C) Subject to [paragraphs (3) and (4) of this subsection and]
subsections (d) and (e) of this section AND §§ 5–2704 AND 5–2705 OF THIS SUBTITLE, for
the [taxable] FISCAL year in which an investment in a qualified Maryland biotechnology
company is made, a qualified investor may [claim a credit against the State income tax in
an amount equal to the amount of tax credit stated in the final credit certificate approved
by the Secretary] BE AWARDED A GRANT BY THE SECRETARY for the investment as
provided under this [section] SUBTITLE.
[(3)] (D) To be eligible for [the tax credit described in paragraph (2) of this
subsection] A GRANT UNDER THIS SUBTITLE, the qualified investor shall be:
[(i)] (1) for a company, duly organized and in good standing in the
jurisdiction under the laws under which it is organized;
[(ii)] (2) for a company, in good standing and authorized or
registered to do business in the State;
[(iii)] (3) current in the payment of all tax obligations to the State
or any unit or subdivision of the State; and
[(iv)] (4) not in default under the terms of any contract with,
indebtedness to, or grant from the State or any unit or subdivision of the State.

SENATE BILL 247 7
[(4)] (E) To be eligible for [the tax credit described in paragraph (2) of this
subsection] A GRANT UNDER THIS SUBTITLE, the qualified investor may not, after
making the proposed investment, own or control more than 25% of the equity interests in
the qualified Maryland biotechnology company in which the investment is to be made.
5–2703.
[(c)] (A) [(1)] At least 30 days prior to making an investment in a qualified
Maryland biotechnology company for which a qualified investor would be eligible for an
initial [tax credit] GRANT ELIGIBILITY certificate under [subsection (b) of this section]
THIS SUBTITLE, the qualified investor shall submit an application to the Department.
[(2)] (B) The application shall evidence that the qualified Maryland
biotechnology company is:
[(i)] (1) in good standing;
[(ii)] (2) current in the payment of all tax obligations to the State
or any unit or subdivision of the State; and
[(iii)] (3) not in default under the terms of any contract with,
indebtedness to, or grant from the State or any unit or subdivision of the State.
[(3)] (C) [(i)] (1) Subject to [subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph]
PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, the Department shall:
[1.] (I) approve all applications that qualify for [credits] A
GRANT under this [section] SUBTITLE on a first–come, first–served basis; and
[2.] (II) within 30 days of receipt of an application, [certify
the amount of any approved tax credits] ISSUE AN INITIAL GRANT ELIGIBILITY
CERTIFICATE to a qualified investor.
[(ii)] (2) The Department may not issue any [tax credit certificates]
GRANTS under this [section] SUBTITLE after June 30, 2028.
[(4)] (D) [(i)] (1) After the date on which the Department issues an
initial [tax credit] GRANT ELIGIBILITY certificate under this [section] SUBTITLE, a
qualified investor shall have 30 calendar days to make an investment in a qualified
Maryland biotechnology company under this [section] SUBTITLE.
[(ii)] (2) Within 10 calendar days after the date on which a
qualified investor makes the investment, the qualified investor shall provide to the
Department notice and proof of the making of the investment, including:

SENATE BILL 247
[1.] (I) the date of the investment;
[2.] (II) the amount invested;
[3.] (III) proof of the receipt of the invested funds by the
qualified Maryland biotechnology company;
[4.] (IV) a complete description of the nature of the
ownership interest in the equity of the qualified Maryland biotechnology company acquired
in consideration of the investment; and
[5.] (V) any reasonable supporting documentation the
Department may require.
[(iii)] (3) If a qualified investor does not provide the notice and proof
of the making of the investment required in [subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph]
PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION within 40 calendar days after the date on which
the Department issues an initial [tax credit] GRANT ELIGIBILITY certificate under this
[section] SUBTITLE:
[1.] (I) the Department shall rescind the initial [tax credit]
GRANT ELIGIBILITY certificate; and
[2.] (II) the [credit] GRANT amount allocated to the
rescinded certificate shall [revert to the Maryland Biotechnology Investment Tax Credit
Reserve Fund and shall] be available in the applicable fiscal year for allocation by the
Department to other initial [tax credit] GRANT ELIGIBILITY certificates in accordance
with the provisions of this [section] SUBTITLE.
5–2704.
[(d)] (A) [(1) The tax credit] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION, THE GRANT allowed in an initial [tax credit] GRANT ELIGIBILITY certificate
issued under this [section] SUBTITLE is:
[(i)] (1) except as provided in item [(ii) of this paragraph] (2) OF
THIS SUBSECTION, 33% of the investment in a qualified Maryland biotechnology company,
not to exceed $250,000; or
[(ii)] (2) 50% of the investment in the qualified Maryland
biotechnology company, not to exceed $500,000, if a qualified Maryland biotechnology
company:
[1.] (I) is located in Allegany County, Dorchester County,
Garrett County, or Somerset County; or

SENATE BILL 247 9
[2.] (II) is located in a Regional Institution Strategic
Enterprise zone that is designated under [Title 5,] Subtitle 14 of [the Economic
Development Article] THIS TITLE, is based on technology that was developed at a qualified
institution within that zone, and has been in active business not longer than 7 years.
[(2)] (B) During any fiscal year, the Secretary may not certify eligibility
for [tax credits] GRANTS for investments in a single qualified Maryland biotechnology
company that in the aggregate exceed 10% of the total appropriations to the [Maryland
Biotechnology Investment Tax Credit Reserve] Fund for that fiscal year.
[(3) If the tax credit allowed under this section in any taxable year exceeds
the total tax otherwise payable by the qualified investor for that taxable year, the qualified
investor may claim a refund in the amount of the excess.
(e) (1) In this subsection, “Reserve Fund” means the Maryland Biotechnology
Investment Tax Credit Reserve Fund established under paragraph (2) of this subsection.
(2) (i) There is a Biotechnology Investment Tax Credit Reserve Fund
which is a special continuing, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to § 7–302 of the State
Finance and Procurement Article.
(ii) The money in the Fund shall be invested and reinvested by the
Treasurer, and interest and earnings shall be credited to the General Fund.]
[(3)] (C) [(i)] (1) Subject to the provisions of this [subsection]
SECTION, the Secretary shall issue an initial [tax credit] GRANT ELIGIBILITY certificate
for each approved investment in a qualified Maryland biotechnology company eligible for a
[tax credit] GRANT.
[(ii)] (2) An initial [tax credit] GRANT ELIGIBILITY certificate
issued under this [subsection] SECTION shall state the maximum GRANT amount [of tax
credit] for which the qualified investor is eligible.
[(iii)] (3) [1.] (I) Except as otherwise provided in this
[subparagraph] PARAGRAPH, for any fiscal year, the Secretary may not issue initial [tax
credit] GRANT ELIGIBILITY certificates [for credit amounts] in the aggregate totaling
more than the amount appropriated to the [Reserve] Fund for that fiscal year in the State
budget as approved by the General Assembly.
[2.] (II) If the aggregate [credit] GRANT amounts under
initial [tax credit] GRANT ELIGIBILITY certificates issued in a fiscal year total less than
the amount appropriated to the [Reserve] Fund for that fiscal year, any excess amount
shall remain in the [Reserve] Fund and may be issued under initial [tax credit] GRANT
ELIGIBILITY certificates for the next fiscal year.

SENATE BILL 247
[3.] (III) For any fiscal year, if funds are transferred from the
[Reserve] Fund under the authority of any provision of law [other than under paragraph
(4) of this subsection], the maximum [credit] GRANT amounts in the aggregate for which
the Secretary may issue initial [tax credit] GRANT ELIGIBILITY certificates shall be
reduced by the amount transferred.
[(iv) For each fiscal year, the Governor shall include in the budget bill
an appropriation to the Reserve Fund.
(v) Notwithstanding the provisions of § 7–213 of the State Finance
and Procurement Article, the Governor may not reduce an appropriation to the Reserve
Fund in the State budget as approved by the General Assembly.]
[(vi)] (D) (1) Based on the actual amount of an investment made
by a qualified investor AS DOCUMENTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 5–2703(D) OF THIS
SUBTITLE, the Secretary shall [issue a final tax credit certificate] AWARD A GRANT to the
qualified investor.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DISBURSE THE GRANT TO THE
QUALIFIED INVESTOR WITHIN 90 DAYS OF DETERMINING THAT THE INVESTMENT
HAS BEEN MADE.
[(4) (i) Except as provided in this paragraph, money appropriated to the
Reserve Fund shall remain in the Fund.
(ii) 1. Within 15 days after the end of each calendar quarter, the
Department shall notify the Comptroller as to each final credit certificate issued during the
quarter:
A. the maximum credit amount stated in the initial tax credit
certificate for the investment; and
B. the final certified credit amount for the investment.
2. On notification that an investment has been certified, the
Comptroller shall transfer an amount equal to the credit amount stated in the initial tax
credit certificate for the investment from the Reserve Fund to the General Fund.]
5–2705.
(A) THERE IS A BIOTECHNOLOGY INVESTMENT INCENTIVE GRANT
PROGRAM FUND.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.

SENATE BILL 247 11
(C) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(D) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND;
(2) ANY GRANT AMOUNT THAT IS REVOKED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE;
AND
(3) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(E) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY FOR GRANTS PROVIDED UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE.
(F) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE.
(G) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(H) (1) FOR EACH FISCAL YEAR, THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE
ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF $10,000,000 TO THE FUND.
(2) NOTWITHSTANDING THE PROVISIONS OF § 7–213 OF THE STATE
FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE, THE GOVERNOR MAY NOT REDUCE AN
APPROPRIATION TO THE FUND IN THE STATE BUDGET AS APPROVED BY THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
5–2706.
[(f)] (A) [(1)] The [credit claimed under this section] GRANT PROVIDED
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE shall be recaptured as provided in [paragraph (2) of this
subsection] SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION if, within 2 years [from the close of the
taxable year for which the credit is claimed] AFTER THE GRANT WAS DISBURSED TO THE
QUALIFIED INVESTOR:

SENATE BILL 247
[(i)] (1) the qualified investor sells, transfers, or otherwise
disposes of the ownership interest in the qualified Maryland biotechnology company that
gave rise to the [credit] GRANT; or
[(ii)] (2) the qualified Maryland biotechnology company that gave
rise to the [credit] GRANT ceases operating as an active business with its headquarters
and base of operations in the State.
[(2)] (B) The amount required to be recaptured under this [subsection]
SECTION is the product of multiplying:
[(i)] (1) the total amount of the [credit claimed] DISBURSED
GRANT or, in the case of an event described in [paragraph (1)(i) of this subsection]
SUBSECTION (A)(1) OF THIS SECTION, the portion of the [credit] DISBURSED GRANT
attributable to the ownership interest disposed of; and
[(ii)] (2) [1.] (I) 100%, if the event requiring recapture of the
[credit occurs during the taxable year for which the tax credit is claimed] DISBURSED
GRANT OCCURS IN THE SAME FISCAL YEAR THAT THE GRANT WAS DISBURSED;
[2.] (II) 67%, if the event requiring recapture of the [credit
occurs during the first year after the close of the taxable year for which the tax credit is
claimed] DISBURSED GRANT OCCURS IN THE FISCAL YEAR AFTER THE GRANT WAS
DISBURSED; or
[3.] (III) 33%, if the event requiring recapture of the [credit
occurs more than 1 year but not more than 2 years after the close of the taxable year for
which the tax credit is claimed] DISBURSED GRANT OCCURS IN THE SECOND FISCAL
YEAR AFTER THE GRANT WAS DISBURSED.
(C) IF A COMPANY RECEIVES AN INVESTMENT AND FAILS TO SATISFY THE
REQUIREMENTS FOR A QUALIFIED MARYLAND BIOTECHNOLOGY COMPANY WITHIN
2 MONTHS OF THE RECEIPT OF THE INVESTMENT, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REVOKE
100% OF THE DISBURSED GRANT AMOUNT.
[(3)] (D) (1) The qualified investor that [claimed the credit] HAS A
DISBURSED GRANT THAT IS RECAPTURED UNDER THIS SECTION shall pay the
RECAPTURED amount to [be recaptured as determined under paragraph (2) of this
subsection as taxes payable to the State for the taxable year in which the event requiring
recapture of the credit occurs] THE DEPARTMENT BY THE DATE SET BY THE
DEPARTMENT.

SENATE BILL 247 13
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEPOSIT THE RECAPTURED AMOUNT
INTO THE FUND.
5–2707.
[(g)] (A) [(1)] The Department may revoke its initial [or final] ELIGIBILITY
certification OR AWARD of an approved [credit] GRANT under this [section] SUBTITLE if
any representation in connection with the application for the certification is determined by
the Department to have been false when made.
[(2)] (B) The revocation may be in full or in part as the Department may
determine and, subject to [paragraph (3) of this subsection] SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS
SECTION, shall be communicated to the qualified investor [and the Comptroller].
[(3)] (C) The qualified investor shall have an opportunity to appeal any
revocation to the Department [prior to notification of the Comptroller].
[(4) The Comptroller may make an assessment against the qualified
investor to recapture any amount of tax credit that the qualified investor has already
claimed.]
5–2708.
[(h)] In accordance with § 2.5–109 of [the Economic Development Article] THIS
ARTICLE, the Department shall report on the initial [tax credit] ELIGIBILITY GRANT
certificates awarded for the calendar year and the qualified Maryland biotechnology
companies that received an investment for which an initial [tax credit] ELIGIBILITY
GRANT certificate was awarded.
5–2709.
[(i)] The Department [and the Comptroller jointly] shall adopt regulations to carry
out the provisions of this section and to specify criteria and procedures for application for,
approval of, and monitoring continuing eligibility for the [tax credit under this section]
PROGRAM.
6–1001.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Level 1 opportunity zone enhancement” means an enhanced tax credit OR
GRANT under the Program for which a qualified opportunity zone business or qualified
opportunity fund is eligible if:
(1) the following information is provided to the Department:

SENATE BILL 247
(i) the date of the qualified opportunity fund’s investment in the
qualified opportunity zone business and the amount of the investment;
(ii) the total project or business investment, including any leverage;
(iii) the address and census tract of the qualified opportunity zone
business and the qualified opportunity fund;
(iv) the North American Industrial Classification System Code for
the qualified opportunity zone business;
(v) an impact report, including both qualitative and quantitative
data on the investment and, as applicable, its progress toward:
1. creating and retaining jobs;
2. promoting entrepreneurship, including among
women– and minority–owned businesses;
3. providing affordable housing;
4. creating access to healthy food;
5. promoting environmental sustainability; and
6. benefiting the communities in the opportunity zone in a
manner not otherwise specified in this item; and
(vi) unless an applicant provides an affidavit to the Department
along with the application that the qualified opportunity zone business property is
unoccupied, will be demolished within 1 year of the date of the application, and will remain
unoccupied until the demolition is complete, with respect to qualified opportunity zone
business property that is an affected property required to be registered with the
Department of the Environment under § 6–811 of the Environment Article:
1. proof of registration with the Department of the
Environment;
2. if the property contains at least one residential rental unit,
proof of lead inspections conducted in accordance with §§ 6–815 and 6–819 of the
Environment Article;
3. if the property is an owner–occupied residential rental
property:

SENATE BILL 247 15
A. proof that visual exterior or interior painted surfaces are
free of chipping, flaking, or peeling lead–based paint; and
B. a copy of passing test results for lead–contaminated dust;
and
4. verification that, for the substantial improvement of the
property performed in accordance with § 1400Z–2(d)(2)(D)(ii) of the Internal Revenue Code,
replacement doors and windows are free of lead–based paint; and
(vii) any other information requested by the Department that meets
the transparency goals of the Program; and
(2) for a qualified opportunity zone business located in an opportunity zone
in a county with a minimum wage that exceeds the State minimum wage, the qualified
opportunity zone business pays to each employee wages that exceed the greater of:
(i) 120% of the State minimum wage; or
(ii) 120% of the county minimum wage.
(c) “Level 2 opportunity zone enhancement” means an enhanced tax credit OR
GRANT under the Program for which a qualified opportunity zone business or qualified
opportunity fund is eligible if:
(1) the requirements for a Level 1 opportunity zone enhancement are met;
(2) (i) accountability to residents of the communities in the opportunity
zone is maintained through their representation on any governing board or advisory board
of the qualified opportunity zone business; or
(ii) a community benefits agreement is negotiated and agreed to by
community groups or strategic industry partnerships, as defined under § 11–701 of the
Labor and Employment Article, in the opportunity zone and the qualified opportunity fund
that specifies a range of community benefits that the fund agrees to provide as part of the
development project, including workforce development or local hiring requirements; and
(3) (i) for a qualified opportunity zone business located entirely within
an opportunity zone in a municipal corporation, the municipal corporation, by resolution or
by letter, delivered to the Department by the municipal corporation’s authorized designee,
approves the provision of the enhanced tax credits OR GRANTS under the Program within
the municipal corporation; or
(ii) for a qualified opportunity zone business in an opportunity zone
that is not located entirely within a municipal corporation, the county, by resolution or by
letter, delivered to the Department by the county’s authorized designee, approves the
provision of the enhanced tax credits OR GRANTS under the Program within the county.

SENATE BILL 247
(d) “Opportunity zone” means an area that has been designated as a qualified
opportunity zone in the State under § 1400Z–1 of the Internal Revenue Code.
(e) “Program” means the Opportunity Zone Enhancement Program in the
Department established under § 6–1002 of this subtitle that allows enhanced tax credits
OR GRANTS under:
(1) § 6–304 of this title (Job Creation);
(2) § 6–403 of this title (One Maryland economic development);
(3) § 10–702 of the Tax – General Article (wages paid in an enterprise
zone);
(4) [§ 10–725 of the Tax – General Article] TITLE 5, SUBTITLE 27 OF
THIS ARTICLE (biotechnology investment incentive);
(5) § 10–733 of the Tax – General Article (cybersecurity investment
incentive); and
(6) § 10–741 of the Tax – General Article (More Jobs for Marylanders).
6–1006.
(a) In this section, “investment”, “qualified investor”, and “qualified Maryland
biotechnology company” have the meanings stated in [§ 10–725 of the Tax – General
Article] § 5–2701 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(b) For a qualified opportunity fund that is a qualified investor in a qualified
Maryland biotechnology company under [§ 10–725 of the Tax – General Article] TITLE 5,
SUBTITLE 27 OF THIS ARTICLE, if the qualified Maryland biotechnology company, on or
after March 1, 2018, is newly established in or expands into an opportunity zone:
(1) the Level 1 opportunity zone enhancement is 65% of the investment in
a qualified Maryland biotechnology company in any county, not to exceed $575,000; and
(2) the Level 2 opportunity zone enhancement is 75% of the investment in
the qualified Maryland biotechnology company in any county, not to exceed $750,000.
(c) The enhanced [tax credit] GRANT percentages and maximums authorized
under subsection (b) of this section are in substitution for and not in addition to the
percentages and maximums under [§ 10–725(d) of the Tax – General Article] TITLE 5,
SUBTITLE 27 OF THIS ARTICLE.
Article – Tax – General

SENATE BILL 247 17
10–207.
(a) To the extent included in federal adjusted gross income, the amounts under
this section are subtracted from the federal adjusted gross income of a resident to determine
Maryland adjusted gross income.
(RR) THE SUBTRACTION UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION INCLUDES
THE AMOUNT OF A GRANT RECEIVED FROM THE BIOTECHNOLOGY INVESTMENT
INCENTIVE GRANT PROGRAM UNDER TITLE 5, SUBTITLE 27 OF THE ECONOMIC
DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE.
10–307.
(a) To the extent included in federal taxable income, the amounts under this
section are subtracted from the federal taxable income of a corporation to determine
Maryland modified income.
(H) THE SUBTRACTION UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION INCLUDES
THE AMOUNT OF A GRANT RECEIVED FROM THE BIOTECHNOLOGY INVESTMENT
INCENTIVE GRANT PROGRAM UNDER TITLE 5, SUBTITLE 27 OF THE ECONOMIC
DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE.
10–725.
[(j) If a company receives an investment under subsection (a)(7)(ii) of this section
and fails to satisfy the requirements for a qualified Maryland biotechnology company
within 2 months, the Department shall revoke any final tax credit certificates that have
been issued and recapture any tax credits already claimed by the qualified investor.]
10–804.
(j) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a taxpayer claiming
any of the following tax credits shall submit a claim for the credit by electronic means as
required by the Comptroller by regulation:
(i) the Job Creation Tax Credit, as provided under Title 6, Subtitle
2 of the Economic Development Article;
(ii) the One Maryland Tax Credit, as provided under Title 6, Subtitle
4 of the Economic Development Article;
(iii) [the Biotechnology Investment Incentive Tax Credit, as provided
under § 10–725 of this title;

SENATE BILL 247
(iv)] the Enterprise Zone Income Tax Credit, as provided under §
10–702 of this title; and
[(v)] (IV) any other tax credit specified by the Comptroller through
regulation.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The provisions of § 10–725 of the Tax – General Article, as that section was in
effect before the effective date of this Act, shall continue to apply to tax credit certificates
issued under that section before the effective date of this Act.
(b) Title 5, Subtitle 27 of the Economic Development Article, as enacted by
Sections 1 and 2 of this Act, shall apply to certificates issued on or after the effective date
of this Act.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.